West Virginia, session 2026, HB4860.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9A. PUBLIC SCHOOL SUPPORT. §18-9A-10a. Direct funding act. (a) This section shall be known and cited as the "Direct Foundation Funding Act".(b) Foundation allowance for instructional funding shall be distributed directly and equally to teachers within districts.(1) Districts shall establish a separate "Classroom Expense Account" for each teacher.(2) Funds shall be deposited directly to the account proportionately from State of West Virginia accounts.(3) Teachers may elect to have Faculty Senate funds deposited to the same account for convenience.(c) A "Classroom Expense Account" shall be held in a teacher’s name for exclusive use for classroom supplies and instructional materials by specified teacher. Teachers shall be issued a purchase card with which to make purchases from that account. (1) Teachers shall have log-in access to view account balances online;(2) Purchases made from "Classroom Expense Account" with a P-card shall be exempt from district vendor registration requirements and quote requirements prior to purchase;(3) Purchases made from Classroom Expense Accounts shall be published online with a link to view from a district home web page.(4) Office of the State Auditor shall provide training to school districts in the proper use and allowable purchases when using a P-card.